Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All students admitted to the common schools shall comply with the lawful regulations for the government of
the schools:
(a) Willful disobedience or defiance of the authority of the teachers or administrators, use of profanity or
vulgarity, assault or battery or abuse of other students, the threat of force or violence, the use or
possession of alcohol or drugs, stealing or destruction or defacing of school property or personal
property of students, the carrying or use of weapons or dangerous instruments, or other incorrigible bad
conduct on school property, as well as off school property at school-sponsored activities, constitutes
cause for suspension or expulsion from school; and
(b) Assault or battery or abuse of school personnel; stealing or willfully or wantonly defacing, destroying,
or damaging the personal property of school personnel on school property, off school property, or at
school-sponsored activities constitutes cause for suspension or expulsion from school.
(2) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy requiring the expulsion from school for a period of at
least twelve (12) months for a student who:
1. Is determined by the board through clear and convincing evidence to have made threats that pose
a danger to the well-being of students, faculty, or staff of the district;[ or]
2. Is determined by the board to have brought a weapon to a school under its jurisdiction. In
determining whether a student has brought a weapon to school, a local board of education shall:[
]
a. Use the definition of "unlawful possession of a weapon on school property"
described[stated] in KRS 527.070; and
b. Include bus stops; or
3. Is in grade six (6) to twelve (12) and is determined by the board to have recklessly, with a
deadly weapon or dangerous instrument, or intentionally caused or attempted to cause
physical injury to a school district employee on school property or at a school function under
the board's jurisdiction. In considering the actions of a student under this subparagraph, a
local board of education shall use the definitions of "dangerous instrument," "deadly
weapon," and "physical injury" in KRS 500.080, and "intentionally" and "recklessly" in
KRS 501.020.
(b) The board shall also adopt a policy requiring disciplinary actions, up to and including expulsion from
school, for a student who is determined by the board to have:
1. Possessed prescription drugs or controlled substances for the purpose of sale or distribution at a
school under the board's jurisdiction;
2. Physically assaulted, [or ]battered, or abused another student on school property, at a bus stop,
or at a school function[educational personnel or other students at a school or school function]
under the board's jurisdiction; or
3. Physically assaulted, battered, or abused school[educational] personnel or other students off
school property and the incident is likely to substantially disrupt the educational process.
(c) As used in this subsection:
1. "Bus stop" means a location where students wait for, board, or disembark a school bus of the
school district while those actions are occurring; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. "School personnel" shall not include a student who is employed by a school or enrolled in any
school-based apprenticeship program.
(3) (a) The board may modify the expulsion requirement and length for students on a case-by-case basis,
except the length of expulsion shall be at least twelve (12) months for a violation set forth in subsection
(2)(a) of this section.
(b) [Nothing in ]This section shall not prohibit a board from expelling a student for longer than twelve (12)
months.
(c) 1. A board that has expelled a student from the student's regular school setting shall provide or
ensure that educational services are provided to the student in an appropriate alternative program
or setting, unless the board has made a determination, on the record, supported by clear and
convincing evidence, that the expelled student posed a threat to the safety of other students or
school staff and could not be placed into an[a] appropriate alternative program or setting[state-
funded agency program]. Behavior which constitutes a threat shall include but not be limited to
the physical assault, battery, or abuse of others; the threat of physical force; being under the
influence of drugs or alcohol; the use, possession, sale, or transfer of drugs or alcohol; the
carrying, possessing, or transfer of weapons or dangerous instruments; and any other behavior
which may endanger the safety of others. Other intervention services as indicated for each
student may be provided by the board or by agreement with the appropriate state or community
agency. The board may refer the student for evaluation or treatment by the appropriate state or
community agency, and may provide other intervention as indicated for each student. A state
agency that provides the service shall be responsible for the cost.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, "appropriate alternative program or setting" means a
program or setting that is not in the school building the student would otherwise attend, and
includes but is not limited to a virtual program as defined in KRS 157.320 and a state-funded
agency program.
3. Educational services provided to an expelled student under this paragraph shall not include
transportation from the student's residence to, or returning from, an appropriate alternative
program or setting.
4. An expelled student shall not participate in any school-sponsored extracurricular or
interscholastic activity of the district while the student is expelled.
(d) 1. In lieu of expelling a student, or upon the expiration of a student's expulsion, a superintendent
may place a student into an alternative program or setting if the superintendent determines
placement of the student in his or her regular school setting is likely to substantially disrupt the
education process or constitutes a threat to the safety of other students or school staff. The action
shall not be taken until the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of
the student has had an opportunity to have a hearing before the board or an appeals committee as
described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
2. The board may adopt a policy to establish an appeals committee and delegate the authority to
hear appeals made under this paragraph to that committee.
3. The alternative program or setting may be provided virtually.
4. Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, students placed in
an alternative program or setting under this paragraph shall be counted in attendance and
membership for state funding purposes in the same manner as other students participating in
alternative programs of the district.
5. Students placed in an alternative program or setting under this paragraph shall be subject to
compulsory attendance requirements under KRS Chapter 159 and applicable local board policy.
6. Following the initial alternative placement of a student under this paragraph, the board shall
review the alternative program or setting placement at least once per year and determine if the
placement should be continued in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, "charges" means substantiated behavior that falls within the grounds for
suspension or expulsion enumerated in subsection (1) of this section, including behavior committed by a
student while enrolled in a private or public school, or in a school within another state. A school board may

CHAPTER 50 3
adopt a policy providing that, if a student is suspended or expelled for any reason or faces charges that may
lead to suspension or expulsion but withdraws prior to a hearing from any public or private school in this or
any other state, the receiving district may review the details of the charges, suspension, or expulsion and
determine if the student will be admitted, and if so, what conditions may be imposed upon the admission,
which may include placement of the student into an alternative program or setting as described in subsection
(3)(d) of this section.
(5) (a) School administrators, teachers, or other school personnel may immediately remove or cause to be
removed threatening or violent students from a classroom setting or from the district transportation
system pending any further disciplinary action that may occur. Each board of education shall adopt a
policy to assure the implementation of this section and to assure the safety of the students and staff.
(b) Except as described in subsection (10) of this section:
1. A principal may establish procedures for a student's removal from and reentry to the classroom
when the student's behavior disrupts the classroom environment and education process or the
student challenges the authority of a supervising adult. In addition to removal, the student shall
be subject to further discipline for the behavior consistent with the school's code of conduct;[.]
2. A student who is removed from the same classroom three (3) times within a thirty (30) day
period shall be considered chronically disruptive and may be suspended from school in
accordance with this section, and no other basis for suspension shall be deemed necessary;[.]
3. At any time during the school year, for a student who has been removed from the classroom
under this paragraph, a principal may require a review of the classroom issues with the teacher
and the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student and
determine a course of action for the teacher and student regarding the student's continued
placement in the classroom;[.]
4. At any time during the school year, a principal may permanently remove a student from a
classroom for the remainder of the school year if the principal determines the student's continued
placement in the classroom will chronically disrupt the education process for other students;[.]
5. When a student is removed from a classroom under this paragraph temporarily or permanently,
the principal shall determine the placement of the student in lieu of that classroom, which may
include but is not limited to:
a. Another classroom in that school; or
b. An alternative program or setting, which may be provided virtually, as approved by the
superintendent;[.]
6. Any permanent action by a principal under this paragraph shall be subject to an appeal process in
accordance with a policy adopted by the board; and[.]
7. Policies compliant with this paragraph shall be included in the code of behavior and discipline
adopted by the board of education under KRS 158.148 and the policies adopted by the school
council under KRS 160.345.
(6) A student shall not be suspended from the common schools until after at least the following due process
procedures have been provided:
(a) The student has been given oral or written notice of the charge or charges against him or her which
constitute cause for suspension;
(b) The student has been given an explanation of the evidence of the charge or charges if the student denies
them; and
(c) The student has been given an opportunity to present his or her own version of the facts relating to the
charge or charges.
These due process procedures shall precede any suspension from the common schools unless immediate
suspension is essential to protect persons or property or to avoid disruption of the ongoing academic process.
In such cases, the due process procedures outlined above shall follow the suspension as soon as practicable,
but no later than three (3) school days after the suspension.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) (a) The superintendent, principal, assistant principal, or head teacher of any school may suspend a student
but shall report the action in writing immediately to the superintendent and to the parent, guardian, or
other person having legal custody or control of the student.
(b) 1. The board of education of any school district may expel or extend the expulsion of any student
for misconduct as described in subsection (1) of this section, but the action shall not be taken
until the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student has had
an opportunity to have a hearing before the board. The decision of the board shall be final.
2. Within thirty (30) days prior to the end of a student's expulsion, the board shall review the details
of the expulsion and current factors and circumstances, including if ending the expulsion will
substantially disrupt the education process or constitute a threat to the safety of students or
school staff, to determine if the expulsion shall be extended for a period not to exceed twelve
(12) months.
3. The expulsion review process shall be used prior to the end of each expulsion period until the
board ends the expulsion or the student is no longer subject to compulsory attendance under KRS
159.010.
4. Each board of education shall adopt a policy for implementation of the process described in this
paragraph.
(8) (a) Suspension of exceptional children, as defined in KRS 157.200, shall be considered a change of
educational placement if:
1. The child is removed for more than ten (10) consecutive days during a school year; or
2. The child is subjected to a series of removals that constitute a pattern because the removals
accumulate to more than ten (10) school days during a school year and because of other factors,
such as the length of each removal, the total amount of time the child is removed, and the
proximity of removals to one another.
(b) The admissions and release committee shall meet to review the placement and make a recommendation
for continued placement or a change in placement and determine whether regular suspension or
expulsion procedures apply. Additional evaluations shall be completed, if necessary.
(c) If the admissions and release committee determines that an exceptional child's behavior is related to his
or her disability, the child shall not be suspended any further or expelled unless the current placement
could result in injury to the child, other children, or the educational personnel, in which case an
appropriate alternative placement shall be provided that will provide for the child's educational needs
and will provide a safe learning and teaching environment for all. If the admissions and release
committee determines that the behavior is not related to the disability, the local educational agency may
pursue its regular suspension or expulsion procedure for the child, if the behavior so warrants.
However, educational services shall not be terminated during a period of expulsion and during a
suspension after a student is suspended for more than a total of ten (10) days during a school year. A
district may seek temporary injunctive relief through the courts if the parent and the other members of
the admissions and release committee cannot agree upon a placement and the current placement will
likely result in injury to the student or others.
(9) Suspension of primary school students shall be considered only in exceptional cases where there are safety
issues for the child or others.
(10) Any action under this section related to students with disabilities shall be in compliance with applicable federal
law.
(11) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be interpreted or construed to preclude the requirements contained in KRS
158.305 or 158.4416.
(12) Notwithstanding the term of an expulsion established under this section or by the board, an expelled student
shall be allowed to return to the school district subject to the following:
(a) At least twenty-six (26) weeks shall have passed since the student was expelled;
(b) The student was expelled pursuant to subsection (2)(a)3. of this section and had not previously been
expelled;
(c) The expelled student shall have:

CHAPTER 50 5
1. Written and submitted a letter to any person injured by the actions that resulted in the
expulsion and to the adjudicating body established in paragraph (d) of this subsection that
requests the end of the student's expulsion;
2. Completed a total number of community service hours that is at least equal to fifteen (15)
hours for each week since the student was expelled;
3. Earned a cumulative grade point average of at least three (3) on any coursework completed
since the student was expelled; and
4. Any other requirements established by the board; and
(d) Upon satisfying all requirements established in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection, an
adjudicating body shall review the expelled student's request to end the expulsion. The adjudicating
body shall:
1. Be composed of the superintendent or designee, the principal or designee, and any individual
person injured by the actions that resulted in the expulsion;
2. Review the expelled student's request and evidence of satisfying the requirements under
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection; and
3. Only authorize the end of the student's expulsion upon unanimous agreement of the members
of the adjudicating body.
Section 2. KRS 158.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any school employee who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a person has made threats or plans of
violence which are intended to target a school or students or who knows that a firearm is present on school
property in violation of KRS 527.070 shall immediately cause a report to be made pursuant to subsection (10)
of this section.
(2) Any school employee shall immediately report pursuant to subsection (10) of this section any act which the
employee has a reasonable cause to believe has occurred on school property or at a school-sponsored or
sanctioned event involving:
(a) Intentional physical injury, or intentional attempt to cause physical injury, as defined in KRS
500.080, of any school employee;
(b) Intentional assault resulting in serious physical injury, as defined in KRS 500.080;
(c)[(b)] A sexual offense;
(d)[(c)] Kidnapping;
(e)[(d)] Assault with the use of a weapon;
(f)[(e)] Possession of a firearm or deadly weapon in violation of the law;
(g)[(f)] The use, possession, or sale of a controlled substance in violation of the law; or
(h)[(g)] Intentional or wanton damage to property causing a pecuniary loss of five hundred dollars
($500) or more.
(3) Any school employee who receives information from a student or other person of conduct which is required to
be reported under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall report the conduct pursuant to subsection (10) of
this section, unless the school employee has cause to believe a student's disability interfered with his or her
ability to conform to the student code of conduct.
(4) If a student has been adjudicated guilty of an offense specified in this subsection or has been expelled from
school for an offense specified in this subsection, prior to a student's admission to any school, the parent,
guardian, principal, or other person or agency responsible for a student shall provide to the school a sworn
statement or affirmation indicating on a form provided by the Kentucky Board of Education that the student
has been adjudicated guilty or expelled from school attendance at a public or private school in this state or
another state for homicide, assault, or an offense in violation of state law or school regulations relating to
weapons, alcohol, or drugs. The sworn statement or affirmation shall be sent to the receiving school within
five (5) working days of the time when the student requests enrollment in the new school.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) If any student who has been expelled from attendance at a public or private school in this state for homicide,
assault, or an offense in violation of state law or school regulations relating to weapons, alcohol, or drugs
requests transfer of his or her records, those records shall reflect the charges and final disposition of the
expulsion proceedings.
(6) If any student who is subject to an expulsion proceeding at a public or private school in this state for homicide,
assault, or an offense in violation of state law or school regulations relating to weapons, alcohol, or drugs
requests transfer of his or her records to a new school, the records shall not be transferred until that proceeding
has been terminated and shall reflect the charges and any final disposition of the expulsion proceedings.
(7) [Neither ]The husband-wife privilege of KRE 504 or[nor] any professional-client privilege, including those set
forth in KRE 506 and 507, shall not be a ground for refusing to make a report required under this section or for
excluding evidence in a judicial proceeding of the making of a report and of the conduct giving rise to the
making of a report. However, the attorney-client privilege of KRE 503 and the religious privilege of KRE 505
are grounds for refusing to make a report or for excluding evidence as to the report and the underlying
conduct.
(8) [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed as to require self-incrimination.
(9) A person acting upon reasonable cause in the making of a report under this section in good faith shall be
immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed from:
(a) Making the report; and
(b) Participating in any judicial proceeding that resulted from the report.
(10) Notice required pursuant to this section shall be given to:[ ]
(a) Any law enforcement agency created by the local board of education;[, and to:]
(b)[(a)] A local law enforcement agency not created by the local board of education; or
(c)[(b)] The Department of Kentucky State Police.
(11) (a) A local board of education that has created a law enforcement agency shall designate a local law
enforcement agency not created by the local board of education to receive reporting information
from the law enforcement agency created by the local board of education.
(b) A law enforcement agency created by the local board of education shall file a report each week with
the local law enforcement agency designated pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection identifying
all reports received pursuant to this section by the law enforcement agency created by the local board
of education during the preceding week.[
(11) Any person who intentionally violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a:
(a) Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and
(c) Class D felony for the third or subsequent offense.]
Section 3. KRS 158.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any member of a school board who votes to permit entrance to a school of any child not eligible therefor
under the provisions of KRS 158.030 shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than fifty dollars
($50).
(2) Any person who intentionally violates Section 2 of this Act shall be guilty of a:
(a) Class B misdemeanor for the first offense; and
(b) Class A misdemeanor for the second or subsequent offense[required to report under KRS 158.155
who fails to report promptly or who refuses to make a report is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor].
Section 4. KRS 159.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Whenever any child of compulsory school age withdraws from school, the teacher of the student[child] shall
ascertain the reason. The fact of the withdrawal and the reason for it shall be immediately transmitted by the
teacher to the superintendent of schools of the district in which the school is located. If the student[child] has
withdrawn because of change of residence, the next residence shall be ascertained and included in the report.

CHAPTER 50 7
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education shall ensure that the student information system facilitates the
collection of student data and the transfer of education records among schools and local districts.
(3) Within five (5) days of a student being expelled under Section 1 of this Act, a school district shall enter the
expulsion in the student's record within the student information system.
(4) A school district shall notify the Kentucky Department of Education when a new student enrolls in a school in
the district.
(5)[(4)] The Kentucky Department of Education, upon notification of a student's enrollment in a school, shall
forward within ten (10) working days all records regarding the student collected under this section to the
receiving district.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version